Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 668. MEMBERSHIP DUES

Sec. 668.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 572.002 except that the term does not include a river authority.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.